Missouri, session 2026, HB2499.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 441, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 441.928, to read as follows:
441.928. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Academic services", services that directly affect a student renter's ability to
be successful academically that include, but shall not be limited to, reliable internet
access, transportation to and from the institution of higher education, study spaces, and
community events;
(2) "Essential services", services that directly affect a renter's ability to be safe,
healthy, and comfortable that include, but shall not be limited to, readily available
laundry facilities, secure building access, secure personal spaces, garbage disposal,
emergency maintenance services, and on-site parking;
(3) "Purpose-built student housing", off-campus housing with a common space
that several student renters share and are responsible for and is designed for student
renters who are attending an institution of higher education in this state and is leased by
the bed or by the room.
2. Any renter of purpose-built student housing shall have the following rights:
(1) The right to a habitable living space, which includes the following
functioning utilities:
(a) Water;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2499 2
(b) Electricity; and
(c) Heat;
(2) The right to timely repairs for maintenance issues arising from normal wear
and tear;
(3) The right to proper notice before entry by the landlord except in emergency
situations;
(4) The right to proper written notice if the purpose-built student housing
property is sold to a new landlord;
(5) The right to not be discriminated against based on protected characteristics
including, but not limited to, race, religion, or disability; and
(6) The right to a lease modification or to exit an existing lease in cases in which
the renter has a change in academic status within the institution of higher education.
Changes in academic status may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Transferring to another institution of higher education not within proximity
to the purpose-built student housing;
(b) Withdrawing from the institution of higher education;
(c) Being removed from the institution of higher education; or
(d) Relocating to another state because of a:
a. Catastrophic illness or accident of a family member of the renter;
b. Death in the family; or
c. Family emergency or other life-changing event that requires the renter to
withdraw from the institution of higher education.
3. A lease between a landlord of purpose-built student housing and a renter of
such housing shall include the following:
(1) Transparency in the withholding of deposits and charging of fees, including
deposits and fees withheld or charged before, during, and at the end of the lease;
(2) How conflicts between renters within each purpose-built student housing
shall be resolved;
(3) How health disclosures on a lease application shall be honored;
(4) Information regarding lease modifications, including transferring a lease or
subleasing and exiting an existing lease if there is a change in academic status;
(5) Lease renewal options, including a right-of-first-refusal clause that includes a
timeline no earlier than the semester prior to when the lease is due to expire;
(6) All academic services and essential services a landlord of purpose-built
student housing is providing to renters of such housing;
(7) A provision regarding refunds of any fees assessed if there is a guarantor on
the lease and rent has been paid in a timely manner; and

HB 2499 3
(8) Information pertaining to the landlord's expectations as to the condition of
the purpose-built student housing when a renter moves into and out of such housing.
4. In conjunction with the attorney general, the department of higher education
and workforce development shall create a flyer that landlords of purpose-built student
housing shall provide to renters, including potential renters, of such housing that shall
include, at a minimum, the lease requirements provided under subsection 3 of this
section. The flyer provided shall be free of charge and shall be specific to the purpose-
built student housing being leased.
5. If the landlord fails to provide any of the listed academic services or essential
services provided in the lease in a timely manner, the landlord shall be deemed guilty of
forcible entry and detainer as described in chapter 534; provided, however, that this
subsection shall not be applicable if the landlord takes such action for health or safety
reasons.
✔